Nebraska, session 109, LB1230.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1230 LB1230
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-149, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-149 (1)(a) If a certificate of title has previously been issued
for a vehicle in this state, the application for a new certificate of
title shall be accompanied by the certificate of title duly assigned
except as otherwise provided in the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title
Act.
(b) Except for manufactured homes or mobile homes as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, if a certificate of title has not
previously been issued for the vehicle in this state or if a certificate
of title is unavailable, the application shall be accompanied by:
(i) A manufacturer's or importer's certificate except as otherwise
provided in subdivision (viii) of this subdivision;
(ii) A duly certified copy of the manufacturer's or importer's
certificate;
(iii) An affidavit by the owner affirming ownership in the case of
an all-terrain vehicle, a utility-type vehicle, or a minibike;
(iv) A certificate of title from another state;
(v) A court order issued by a court of record, a manufacturer's
certificate of origin, or an assigned registration certificate, if the
law of the state from which the vehicle was brought into this state does
not have a certificate of title law;
(vi) Evidence of ownership as provided for in section 30-24,125,
sections 52-601.01 to 52-605, sections 60-1901 to 60-1911, or sections
60-2401 to 60-2411;
(vii) Documentation prescribed in section 60-142.01, 60-142.02,
60-142.04, 60-142.05, 60-142.09, or 60-142.11 or documentation of
compliance with section 76-1607;
(viii) A manufacturer's or importer's certificate and an affidavit
by the owner affirming ownership in the case of a minitruck;
(ix) In the case of a motor vehicle, a trailer, an all-terrain
-2-

LB1230 LB1230
2026 2026
vehicle, a utility-type vehicle, or a minibike, an affidavit by the
holder of a motor vehicle auction dealer's license as described in
subdivision (11) of section 60-1406 affirming that the certificate of
title is unavailable and that the vehicle (A) is a salvage vehicle
through payment of a total loss settlement, (B) is a salvage vehicle
purchased by the auction dealer, or (C) has been donated to an
organization operating under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code as defined in section 49-801.01; or
(x) A United States Government Certificate to Obtain Title to a
Vehicle.
(c) If the application for a certificate of title in this state is
accompanied by a valid certificate of title issued by another state which
meets that state's requirements for transfer of ownership, then the
application may be accepted by this state.
(d) If a certificate of title has not previously been issued for the
vehicle in this state and the applicant is unable to provide such
documentation, the applicant may apply for a bonded certificate of title
as prescribed in section 60-167.
(2)(a) If the application for a certificate of title for a
manufactured home or a mobile home is being made in accordance with
subdivision (4)(b) of section 60-137 or if the certificate of title for a
manufactured home or a mobile home is unavailable, the application shall
be accompanied by proof of ownership in the form of:
(i) A duly assigned manufacturer's or importer's certificate;
(ii) A certificate of title from another state;
(iii) A court order issued by a court of record;
(iv) Evidence of ownership as provided for in the Disposition of
Personal Property Landlord and Tenant Act or section 30-24,125, sections
52-601.01 to 52-605, sections 60-1901 to 60-1911, or sections 60-2401 to
60-2411 , or documentation of compliance with section 76-1607; or
(v) Assessment records for the manufactured home or mobile home from
-3-

LB1230 LB1230
2026 2026
the county assessor and an affidavit by the owner affirming ownership.
(b) If the applicant cannot produce proof of ownership described in
subdivision (a) of this subsection, he or she may submit to the
department such evidence as he or she may have, and the department may
thereupon, if it finds the evidence sufficient, issue the certificate of
title or authorize the county treasurer to issue a certificate of title,
as the case may be.
(3) For purposes of this section, certificate of title includes a
salvage certificate, a salvage branded certificate of title, or any other
document of ownership issued by another state or jurisdiction for a
salvage vehicle. Only a salvage branded certificate of title shall be
issued to any vehicle conveyed upon a salvage certificate, a salvage
branded certificate of title, or any other document of ownership issued
by another state or jurisdiction for a salvage vehicle. A previously
salvage branded certificate of title may be issued if, prior to
application, the applicant's vehicle has been repaired and inspected as
provided in section 60-146.
(4) The county treasurer shall retain the evidence of title
presented by the applicant and on which the certificate of title is
issued.
(5)(a) If an affidavit is submitted under subdivision (1)(b)(ix) of
this section, the holder of a motor vehicle auction dealer's license
shall certify that (i) it has made at least two written attempts and has
been unable to obtain the properly endorsed certificate of title to the
property noted in the affidavit from the owner and (ii) thirty days have
expired after the mailing of a written notice regarding the intended
disposition of the property noted in the affidavit by certified mail,
return receipt requested, to the last-known address of the owner and to
any lien or security interest holder of record of the property noted in
the affidavit.
(b) The notice under subdivision (5)(a)(ii) of this section shall
-4-

LB1230 LB1230
2026 2026
contain a description of the property noted in the affidavit and a
statement that title to the property noted in the affidavit shall vest in
the holder of the motor vehicle auction dealer's license thirty days
after the date such notice was mailed.
(c) The mailing of notice and the expiration of thirty days under
subdivision (5)(a)(ii) of this section shall extinguish any lien or
security interest of a lienholder or security interest holder in the
property noted in the affidavit, unless the lienholder or security
interest holder has claimed such property within such thirty-day period.
The holder of a motor vehicle auction dealer's license shall transfer
possession of the property noted in the affidavit to the lienholder or
security interest holder claiming such property.
Sec. 2. Section 60-166, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-166 (1)(a) This subsection applies prior to the implementation
date designated by the Director of Motor Vehicles pursuant to subsection
(2) of section 60-1508.
(b) In the event of (i) the transfer of ownership of a vehicle by
operation of law as upon inheritance, devise, bequest, order in
bankruptcy, insolvency, replevin, or execution sale or as provided in
sections 30-24,125, 52-601.01 to 52-605, 60-1901 to 60-1911, and 60-2401
to 60-2411, (ii) the engine of a vehicle being replaced by another
engine, (iii) a vehicle being sold to satisfy storage or repair charges
or under section 76-1607, or (iv) repossession being had upon default in
performance of the terms of a chattel mortgage, trust receipt,
conditional sales contract, or other like agreement, the county treasurer
of any county or the department, upon the surrender of the prior
certificate of title or the manufacturer's or importer's certificate, or
when that is not possible, upon presentation of satisfactory proof of
ownership and right of possession to such vehicle, and upon payment of
the appropriate fee and the presentation of an application for
-5-

LB1230 LB1230
2026 2026
certificate of title, may issue to the applicant a certificate of title
thereto.
(2)(a) This subsection applies beginning on the implementation date
designated by the director pursuant to subsection (2) of section 60-1508.
(b) In the event of (i) the transfer of ownership of a vehicle by
operation of law as upon inheritance, devise, bequest, order in
bankruptcy, insolvency, replevin, or execution sale or as provided in the
Disposition of Personal Property Landlord and Tenant Act or section
30-24,125, sections 52-601.01 to 52-605, sections 60-1901 to 60-1911, and
sections 60-2401 to 60-2411, (ii) the engine of a vehicle being replaced
by another engine, (iii) a vehicle being sold to satisfy storage or
repair charges or under section 76-1607, or (iv) repossession being had
upon default in performance of the terms of a chattel mortgage, trust
receipt, conditional sales contract, or other like agreement, and upon
acceptance of an electronic certificate of title record after
repossession, in addition to the title requirements in this section, the
county treasurer of any county or the department, upon the surrender of
the prior certificate of title or the manufacturer's or importer's
certificate, or when that is not possible, upon presentation of
satisfactory proof of ownership and right of possession to such vehicle,
and upon payment of the appropriate fee and the presentation of an
application for certificate of title, may issue to the applicant a
certificate of title thereto.
(3) If the prior certificate of title issued for such vehicle
provided for joint ownership with right of survivorship, a new
certificate of title shall be issued to a subsequent purchaser upon the
assignment of the prior certificate of title by the surviving owner and
presentation of satisfactory proof of death of the deceased owner.
(4) Only an affidavit by the person or agent of the person to whom
possession of such vehicle has so passed, setting forth facts entitling
him or her to such possession and ownership, together with a copy of a
-6-

LB1230 LB1230
2026 2026
court order or an instrument upon which such claim of possession and
ownership is founded, shall be considered satisfactory proof of ownership
and right of possession, except that if the applicant cannot produce such
proof of ownership, he or she may submit to the department such evidence
as he or she may have, and the department may thereupon, if it finds the
evidence sufficient, issue the certificate of title or authorize any
county treasurer to issue a certificate of title, as the case may be.
(5) If from the records of the county treasurer or the department
there appear to be any liens on such vehicle, such certificate of title
shall comply with section 60-164, 60-165, or 60-165.02 regarding such
liens unless the application is accompanied by proper evidence of their
satisfaction or extinction.
Sec. 3. Section 69-2302, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
69-2302 For purposes of the Disposition of Personal Property
Landlord and Tenant Act:
(1) Landlord means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of furnished or
unfurnished premises , including self-service storage units or
facilities, for rent or his or her agent or successor in interest;
(2) Mobile home has the same meaning as in section 76-1463;
(3) Mobile home park has the same meaning as in section 76-1464;
(4) Mobile home space has the same meaning as in section 76-1465;
(5) (2) Owner means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in
whom is vested (a) all or part of the legal title to property or (b) all
or part of the beneficial ownership and a right to present use and
enjoyment of premises and shall include a mortgagee in possession;
(6) Personal property means movable property not affixed to land.
Personal property includes, but is not limited to, goods, wares,
merchandise, motor vehicles, mobile homes, watercraft, household items,
and furnishings;
(7) (3) Premises means:
-7-

LB1230 LB1230
2026 2026
(a) A a dwelling unit as defined in section 76-1410 or section
76-1459 or a distinct portion of a dwelling unit, the facilities and
appurtenances in such dwelling unit, and the grounds, areas, and
facilities held out for the use of tenants generally or the use of which
is promised to the tenants;
(b) A mobile home space or mobile home park; or
(c) Self-service (b) self-service storage units or facilities;
(8) (4) Reasonable belief means the knowledge or belief a prudent
person should have without making an investigation, including any
investigation of public records, except that when the landlord has
specific information indicating that such an investigation would more
probably than not reveal pertinent information and the cost of such an
investigation would be reasonable in relation to the probable value of
the personal property involved, reasonable belief shall include the
actual knowledge or belief a prudent person would have if such
investigation were made;
(9) (5) Reasonable costs of storage includes:
(a) Reasonable costs actually incurred, the reasonable value of
labor actually provided, or both in removing personal property from its
original location on the vacated premises to the place of storage,
including disassembly and transportation; and
(b) Reasonable storage costs actually incurred which shall not
exceed the fair rental value of the space reasonably required for the
storage of the personal property; and
(10) (6) Tenant means a person entitled under a rental agreement to
occupy any premises for rent or storage uses to the exclusion of others
whether such premises are used as a dwelling unit or self-service storage
unit or facility or not.
Sec. 4. Section 69-2303, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
69-2303 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of
-8-

LB1230 LB1230
2026 2026
section 76-1414, when personal property remains on the premises after a
tenancy has terminated or expired and the premises have been vacated by
the tenant, the landlord shall give written notice as provided in
subsection (2) of this section to such tenant and to any other person the
landlord reasonably believes to be the owner of the property.
(2)(a) The notice required by subsection (1) of this section shall
describe the property in a manner reasonably adequate to permit the owner
of the property to identify it. The notice may describe all or a portion
of the property, but the limitation of liability provided by section
69-2309 shall not protect the landlord from any liability arising from
the disposition of property not described in the notice, except that the
notice need not describe the contents of any:
(i) Trunk a trunk, valise, box, or other container which is locked,
fastened, or tied in a manner which deters immediate access to its
contents; or
(ii) Mobile home which is locked in a manner which deters immediate
access to its interior may be described as such without describing its
contents.
(b) The notice shall state that reasonable costs of storage may be
charged before the property is returned, the location where the property
may be claimed, and the date on or before which such property must be
claimed.
(c) The date specified in the notice shall be a date not less than
seven days after the notice is personally delivered or, if mailed, not
less than fourteen days after the notice is deposited in the mail.
(d) The notice shall be given within six months of the date of
expiration of the lease of the property or the date of discovery of the
abandonment, whichever is later.
(3) The notice shall be personally delivered or sent by first-class
mail, postage prepaid, to the person to be notified at his or her last-
known address and, if there is reason to believe that the notice sent to
-9-

LB1230 LB1230
2026 2026
that address will not be received by him or her, also delivered or sent
to such other address, if any, known to the landlord at which such person
may reasonably be expected to receive the notice.
Sec. 5. Section 69-2308, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
69-2308 (1) If the personal property is not released pursuant to
section 69-2307, it shall be sold at public sale by competitive bidding,
except that if the landlord reasonably believes that the total resale
value of the property not released is less than two thousand dollars, he
or she may retain such property for his or her own use or dispose of it
in any manner he or she chooses. At such time as the decision to sell or
to retain is made, any locked mobile home or trunk, valise, box, or other
container shall be opened, if practicable, with as little damage as
possible, and its contents evaluated. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to preclude the landlord or the tenant from bidding on the
property at the public sale. The successful bidder's title shall be
subject to ownership rights, liens, and security interests which have
priority by law.
(2) Notice of the time and place of the public sale shall be given
by advertisement of the sale published once a week for two consecutive
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the sale
is to be held. If there is no newspaper of general circulation in the
county where the sale is to be held, the advertisement shall be posted no
fewer than ten days before the sale in not less than six conspicuous
places in the neighborhood of the proposed sale. The sale shall be held
at the nearest suitable place to the place where the personal property is
held or stored. The advertisement shall include a description of the
goods, the name of the former tenant, and the time and place of the sale.
The sale shall take place no sooner than ten days after the first
publication. The last publication shall be no less than five days before
the sale is to be held. Notice of sale may be published before the last
-10-

LB1230 LB1230
2026 2026
of the dates specified for taking possession of the property in any
notice given pursuant to section 69-2303.
(3) The notice of the sale shall describe the property to be sold in
a manner reasonably adequate to permit the owner of the property to
identify it. The notice may describe all or a portion of the property,
but the limitation of liability provided by section 69-2309 shall not
release the landlord from any liability arising from the disposition of
property not described in the notice.
(4) After deduction of the reasonable costs of storage, advertising,
and sale, any proceeds of the sale not claimed by the former tenant, an
owner other than such tenant, or another person having an interest in the
proceeds shall, not later than thirty days after the date of sale, be
remitted to the State Treasurer for disposition pursuant to the Uniform
Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act. The former tenant, other owner, or
other person having interest in the proceeds may claim the proceeds by
complying with the act. If the State Treasurer pays the proceeds or any
part thereof to a claimant, neither the State Treasurer nor any employee
thereof shall be liable to any other claimant as to the amount paid.
Sec. 6. Section 76-14,109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-14,109 (1) If a tenant abandons a mobile home on a mobile home
space, the mobile home shall may not be removed from the mobile home
space by the tenant or his or her agent without:
(a) A a signed written authorization from the landlord granting
clearance for removal, showing all money due and owing paid in full; , or
(b) Compliance with the Disposition of Personal Property Landlord
and Tenant Act; or
(c) An an agreement reached with the legal owner and the landlord.
(2) A mobile home shall be considered to be abandoned if the tenant
has defaulted in rent and has, by absence of at least thirty days or by
words or actions, reasonably indicated an intention not to continue the
-11-

LB1230 LB1230
2026 2026
tenancy.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a landlord from removing
an abandoned mobile home from the mobile home space and placing it in
storage at the owner's expense or from utilizing any other legal remedy.
Sec. 7. Original sections 69-2303, 69-2308, and 76-14,109, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, sections 60-149 and 69-2302, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and section 60-166, Revised
Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-12-